New Jersey, session 222, A3450.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  Notwithstanding any law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, the Division of Family Development in the Department of Human Services shall require a subsidy payment, which is issued to a child care provider licensed pursuant to P.L. L.1983, c.492 (C.30:5B-1 et seq.) or a family day care provider registered by a family day care sponsoring organization pursuant to the Family Day Care Provider Registration Act, P.L.1987, c.27 (C.30:5B-16 et seq.), for child care services, to be based on the number of children enrolled with the child care provider who are eligible for child care services.  At no time shall such subsidy payment be based the number of eligible children who are actually in attendance. b.    The subsidy payment issued to a licensed child care provider or a registered family day care provider pursuant to subsection a. of this section shall be based on the number of children enrolled with the provider on October 15 and April 15 of each year. c.    The Commissioner of Human Services shall apply for such State plan amendments or waivers as may be necessary to  implement the provisions of this act and to continue to secure any available federal financial participation for applicable child care programs. d.    As used in this section, child care services means those services provided to eligible children, as certified by the Division of Family Development, for which the division receives and administers State and federal funding to provide subsidy payments to licensed child care providers or registered family day care providers. 2.    The Commissioner of Human Services, pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.) shall adopt rules and regulations necessary to implement the provisions of this act. 3.    This act shall take effect immediately.